District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC WORKS AND OPERATIONS,
That this resolution may be cited as the “Unauthorized Private For-Hire Vehicle Investigation
Reauthorization Resolution of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Findings.
(a) The Committee on Public Works & Operations finds that:
(1) The unauthorized operation of Yazam, Inc., d/b/a Empower, a company that
operates a mobile device application (“app”) offering private for-hire vehicle services in the
District, constitutes a potentially imminent threat to the safety and security of residents and
visitors in the District, and warrants an investigation led by the Chairperson of the Committee on
Public Works and Operations (“the Committee”).
(2) Empower is not authorized to operate in the District, nor are the drivers who
use their app. Empower has not registered as a private vehicle-for-hire company with the
Department of For-Hire Vehicles and is not in compliance – or has not shown proof of
compliance – with numerous laws and regulations to which private vehicle-for-hire companies


are subject, including those covering consumer protection, discrimination, safety inspections,
data disclosure, background checks, and insurance coverage.
(3) The Department of For-Hire Vehicles issued two cease-and-desist orders and a
compliance order requiring Empower to remedy its violation of the law and agency regulations
before April 4, 2024. The company has yet to comply with any order or pay the fines issued for
ongoing violations.
(4) The Committee has received reports of health and safety risks posed by
operators using the Empower app, including reports of stalking, harassment, and impaired
driving. Because of Empower’s unauthorized status, there is currently no way for the Committee
or the public to understand the frequency of these problems, how many instances are reported,
and whether drivers who engaged in these activities are still permitted to use the platform.
(5) Additionally, Empower’s failure to comply with laws pertaining to insurance
requirements for private for-hire-vehicle companies may expose riders to considerable financial
risk in case of injury.
(b) Pursuant to Rule 601(b) of the Rules of Organization and Procedure for the Council
of the District of Columbia, Council Period 26, the Committee authorizes the continuation of the
investigation begun in Council Period 25, in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
(c) The scope of the investigation authorized by subsection (b) of this section shall be:
(1) To investigate the extent of violations of District laws and regulations
governing private for-hire vehicles due to Empower’s continued unauthorized operations and the
resulting lack of oversight;
(2) To ascertain the total amount owed to the District by Empower resulting from
unpaid taxes, civil penalties, and other fees;


(3) To determine the impact of Empower’s continued operations on riders,
operators, and the for-hire vehicle industry in the District as a whole;
(4) To consider whether updates to District laws are needed to ensure the
protection of riders; and
(5) To assess effective enforcement mechanisms to prevent future unauthorized
entry into the private for-hire-vehicle market.
(d) Pursuant to Council Rule 601, the Committee authorizes the use of subpoenas in
furtherance of the investigation authorized by subsection (c) of this section to compel the
attendance of witnesses, to obtain testimony, or to produce documents or other information or
tangible items.
(e) In conducting the investigation, the Committee may take testimony of witnesses by
oral, written, or videotaped depositions.
Sec. 3. Effective date.
This resolution shall take effect immediately.


_____________________________
Councilmember Brianne K. Nadeau
A PROPOSED RESOLUTION
_________________________
IN THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
_________________________
To authorize an investigation by the Committee on Public Works & Operations into the
unauthorized private for-hire-vehicle operations of Yazam, Inc., d/b/a Empower, in the
District of Columbia.

BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Unauthorized Private For-Hire Vehicle Investigation Authorization
Resolution of 2024”.
Sec. 2. Findings.
(a) The Committee on Public Works & Operations finds that:
(1) The unauthorized operation of Yazam, Inc., d/b/a Empower, an app offering
private for-hire vehicle services in the District, constitutes a potentially imminent threat to the
safety and security of residents and visitors in the District, and warrants an investigation led by
the Chairperson of the Committee on Public Works and Operations (“the Committee”).
(2) Empower is not authorized to operate in the District, nor are the drivers who
use their app. Empower has not registered as a private vehicle-for-hire company with
Department of For-Hire Vehicles and is not in compliance – or has not shown proof of
compliance – with numerous laws and regulations to which such companies are subject,
including those covering consumer protection, discrimination, safety inspections, data disclosure,
background checks, and insurance coverage.


(3) The Department of For-Hire Vehicles issued two cease-and-desist orders and a
compliance order requiring Empower to remedy violations before April 4, 2024. The company
has yet to comply with any order or pay any fines issued for ongoing violations.
(4) The Committee has received reports of health and safety risks posed by
operators using the Empower app, including reports of stalking, harassment, and impaired
driving. Because of Empower’s unauthorized status, there is currently no way for the Committee
or the public to understand the frequency of these problems, how many instances are reported,
and whether drivers who engaged in these activities are still permitted to use the platform.
(5) Additionally, Empower’s failure to comply with laws pertaining to insurance
requirements for private for-hire-vehicle companies may expose riders to considerable financial
risk in case of injury.
(b) Pursuant to Rule 601(b) of the Rules of Organization and Procedure for the Council
of the District of Columbia, Council Period 25, the Committee authorizes an investigation in
accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
(c) The scope of the investigation authorized by subsection (b) of this section shall be:
(1) To investigate the extent of violations of District laws and regulations
governing private for-hire vehicles due to Empower’s continued unauthorized operations and the
resulting lack of oversight;
(2) To ascertain the total amount owed to the District by Empower resulting from
unpaid taxes, civil penalties, and other fees;
(3) To determine the impact of Empower’s continued operations on riders,
operators, and the for-hire vehicle industry in the District as a whole;
(4) To consider whether updates to District law are needed to ensure the
protection of riders; and,


(5) To assess effective enforcement mechanisms to prevent future unauthorized
entry into the private for-hire-vehicle market.
(d) Pursuant to Rule 601, the Committee authorizes the use of subpoenas in in
furtherance of the investigation authorized by subsection (b) of this section to compel the
attendance of witnesses, to obtain testimony, or to produce documents or other information or
tangible items.
(e) In conducting the investigation, the Committee may take testimony of witnesses by
oral, written, or videotaped depositions.
Sec. 3. Effective date.
This act shall take effect immediately.